Summary
A wonderful opportunity to acquire a well-proportioned family home requiring thorough renovation located in a sought after residential location offering easy access to Cambridge City Centre and Addenbrookes hospital. The property is offered with the benefit of no onward chain.
"A magnificent Victorian house with beautifully presented accommodation, set in stunning landscaped gardens, in an idyllic west city location."
Substantial property with annexe & walled gardens.
Stunning substantial home on popular road in the city.
"Detached mid-century family house in need of refurbishment, situated in fabulous gardens along one of Cambridge best roads"
"A stylish, modern home, built to a high specification, offering over 3,000sq ft of living accommodation, with a good sized garden, garage and private terrace. READY TO MOVE INTO."
AVAILABLE WITH PART EXCHANGE** The Trinity Villa offers an array of SUSTAINABLE FEATURES. Large private REAR GARDEN & 2ND FLOOR TERRACE. FULLY FITTED KITCHEN & SEPARATE UTILITY ROOM. Family bathroom & 3 EN-SUITES. GARAGE & PARKING. Close to the UNIVERSITY OF CAMBRIDGE PRIMARY SCHOOL.
"An exceptional Edwardian house providing extensive and individual family accommodation with the rare addition of a detached double garage with versatile accommodation above, occupying a generous corner position with large walled gardens in the highly sought-after De Freville conservation area."
A highly prized opportunity in central Cambridge comprising a three storey townhouse and two adjoining duplex apartments in addition to the freehold interest of three neighbouring apartments. Offering a strong potential return in this rapidly expanding district just a short walk from the city cen...
"Exceptional, modern townhouse, situated in a rather unique settling with superb access to schools & colleges, railway station and Addenbrooke's Hospital."
Final property remaining on this exclusive development of just two high-end homes. A rare opportunity to acquire one of a pair of brand-new substantial detached contemporary properties situated in this most sought-after location just off Hills Road and close to Addenbrookes Hospital and Biomedica...
"** SHOW HOME OPEN ** An individually designed four bedroom home on this private development. Occupying the corner plot, and with a generous garden to the rear this stunning home offers open-plan living space, and driveway parking for several cars."
A large bay-fronted Victorian residence in an attractive setting towards Castle Hill with views towards Jesus Green and the River Cam.
"**ONLY TWO PLOTS REMAINING OF THIS THREE STOREY HOME ** A stunning detached family home, with LARGE INTEGRAL GARAGE with EV charging point, dedicated utility room, 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, 4 bathrooms, open-plan kitchen/dining room and a private garden to the rear."
"Introducing 33 De Freville Avenue, a stunning detached townhouse that exhibits beautiful brick elevations under a slate roof with a stunning architectural structure. This property offers versatile family living accommodation with an impressive array of features throughout. The ground floor compri..."
A stylish and immaculately presented Georgian townhouse in a premier central city location.
A unique opportunity to buy a semi-detached Edwardian house with a self-contained separate three bed annexe.
"A superb, bay fronted Victorian townhouse with beautifully presented accommodation throughout, delightfully situated in this sought after residential location. NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Hockeys presents this impressive five-bedroom, detached property in CB1, Cambridge. Built in 2010, the home offers stunning east-facing gardens and is set over three spacious storeys. Communal parking is provided for the properties on the development, with two allocated spaces. The home is conven..."
"*NEW RELEASE* Modern five-bedroom end-of-terrace family home set across three floors - Highly sought-after EDDINGTON location, close to all AMENITIES & the UNIVERSITY OF CAMBRIDGE PRIMARY SCHOOL. Features include Triple glazing, UNDERFLOOR HEATING & Kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. FIND OUT MORE"
"The Bennett is expertly designed with modern specification throughout, spread over three floors, with two good size terraces, garage and parking."
"Substantial and extended, detached 1930’s bay fronted residence with accommodation arranged over three floors extending to about 349 sqm (3757 sqft) occupying a desirable location towards the city end of Milton Road with its own generous enclosed gardens as well as driveway and garaging."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a modern block of six self-contained flats arranged over four floors. This wonderful investment opportunity comprises of a collection of studio, one bedroom and two bedroom units. The property which was completed in 2018 is situated just a short distance from the h..."
"This most impressive bay fronted Edwardian home has been sympathetically improved and extended in more recent times and incorporates many attractive features of quality and character and provides exceptionally well proportioned and versatile living accommodation including four bedrooms, one of w..."
"A substantial & imposing semi-detached property in a prominent position on the corner of Highworth Avenue and Milton Road. Currently arranged as 3 self contained apartments ( 2 x one bed; 1 x two bed) achieving a combined rent of £3190 PCM, on a generous plot with parking for multiple ca..."
This 4/5 bedroom family home offers space and versatile living accommodation on both the ground and first floors. Ample potential for a home office or further improvement. St Thomas's Square is conveniently situated just off Cherry Hinton Road in one of Cambridge's most popular residential area...
"A well proportioned modern townhouse built to an attractive Victorian style in a highly sought after central city location,"
"A three-storey development of five modern, one-bedroom apartments in a convenient location close to Cambridge."
"A unique and rather special opportunity to acquire an individual detached residence extending to about 2364 sqft with versatile accommodation including ground floor bedroom as well as four first floor bedrooms, also benefitting from two large reception rooms as well as spacious open plan kitchen/..."
"*NEW RELEASE- 12 MINS CYCLE FROM CITY* The Sidgwick provides GARAGE with DRIVEWAY, 1st-floor TERRACE, EN-SUITE & FITTED WARDROBES to principal bedroom, FULLY FITTED kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES & CAESARSTONE WORKTOPS, UTILITY ROOM, UNDERFLOOR HEATING to ground floor. Move in late spring 2023"
"Spacious five bedroom house with a first floor terrace, a private rear garden, and a garage."
"A superb, double bay fronted Victorian family house with beautifully presented accommodation, located in the popular Petersfield area of the city and within walking distance of Cambridge mainline railway station."
"*AVAILABLE TO RESERVE NOW* Over 2000sqft, with host of sustainable features, within walking distance of the University of Cambridge Primary School."
"NEW RELEASE Modern four-bedroom family home with expansive living spaces - Highly sought after EDDINGTON location, close to all AMENITIES & the UNIVERSITY OF CAMBRIDGE PRIMARY SCHOOL. Features include Triple glazing, UNDERFLOOR HEATING & Kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES."
"Victorian townhouse, transformed into a flexible spacious home with large private garden and heated garden studio/home office. Knight Frank is proud to present this Victorian townhouse, which has undergone an extensive updating, modernisation and extension programme whilst retaining as much cha..."
"Plot 188, The Chadwick C type offers kitchen/ dining room with FULLY FITTED KITCHEN & INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, UTILITY ROOM, 1st floor LIVING ROOM with access to THREE TERRACES and a spacious master bedroom with EN-SUITE, BUILT IN WARDROBES and PRIVATE TERRACE. Plus a INTEGRAL GARAGE. MOVE IN THIS ..."
Five bedroom family home with views of the nature reserve.
"A superb, modern townhouse, featuring well presented accommodation arranged over three floors, finished to an exceptionally high standard and situated in this sought after location, just a short walk from Addenbrooke's Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
"An elegant 4 bedroom Victorian townhouse benefitting from an exceptional contemporary extension and stylish interior design with flexible accommodation over four floors and 1550 sq ft. The property has a private, landscaped garden with outdoor dining area and secure pedestrian access."
"Plot 191, The Annex offers kitchen/ dining room with FULLY FITTED KITCHEN & INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, UTILITY ROOM, 1st floor LIVING ROOM with access to a PRIVATE TERRACE and STUDIO over the SEPERATE GARAGE. 2nd floor spacious principal bedroom with EN-SUITE and BUILT IN WARDROBES. MOVE IN AUTUMN 20..."
"Substantial Grade II listed end of terrace Georgian residence with versatile and well proportioned accommodation over three floors, forming part of this elegant Georgian terrace in this prestigious central city location close to Botanical Gardens, Lammas Land, private schooling and the Grand Arca..."
Fancy living in this fantastic extended three storey townhouse close to the city centre in the award winning Aura development?
"An attractive bay-fronted Edwardian residence of 1192 sqft / 110 sqm, enjoying an enviable position on the south side of Newnham Croft, a short walk from the River Cam."
"Impressive period family home, situated in a most convenient south city location, with the advantage of private driveway parking."
"FINAL RELEASE OF HOMES - Beautiful new home, offering 1,731 sq ft of accommodation, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, Underfloor heating to the ground floor, GARAGE and DRIVEWAY. Located in a sought-after area just 10 minutes cycle from the city. MOVE IN THIS SPRING."
"A superb 4 bedroom detached family house with high specification, private driveway and garage."
Substantial townhouse for refurbishment with two flats.
"Stunning NEW HOME in the sought after EDDINGTON location, close to all AMENITIES & the UNIVERSITY OF CAMBRIDGE PRIMARY SCHOOL. Features include Triple glazing, UNDERFLOOR HEATING & Kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. Ready to move into Winter 2023"
Beautifully presented and sympathetically improved early Victorian townhouse delightfully located in traffic free lane close to Parker's Piece in the heart of the city together with vehicular access to the rear and garage/parking.
A modern end of terrace house with integral garage.
Fine & Country Cambridge are delighted to bring to market this excellent 4 bedroom extended semi detached house in the extremely popular CB2 postcode.
"PURCHASE WITH JUST A 5% DEPOSIT USING DEPOSIT UNLOCK** Stunning GROUND FLOOR suite at Rubicon, Eddington. Offering UNDERFLOOR HEATING, private TERRACE, basement PARKING SPACE & FLOORING included. Plus access to unique CO-WORKING SPACE. Ready to move into now!"
"An attractive and imposing bay-fronted, four-bedroom detached family home, offering circa two-thousand square feet of generous living accommodation across two floors and residing on the attractive Perne Road, CB1. The property is set back from the roadside via a good size front garden ..."
An established and extended detached residence together with a delightful and mature generous plot extending to about 0.3 of an acre and occupying an outstanding location overlooking an attractive green in this most desirable and highly sought after residential area just to the south of the city.
A substantial bay fronted Victorian 4 storey town house currently used as 8 lettings rooms with their own kitchenette and shared bathroom facilities occupying this sought after location just to the north of Midsummer Common and the river. The property has a enclosed courtyard garden with rear gat...
"A Victorian townhouse with accommodation arranged over 4 floors in this convenient, central city location close to Jesus Green, Midsummer Common and the River Cam."
A charming well presented four storey period town house of about 1200sqft in this rarely available location close to the historic centre of the City. The property is currently split into two one bedroom apartments attracting a premium rent. The owner will reconfigure to its original three bedroom...
Superb Victorian bay fronted semi detached property.
"Just a few minutes´ walk from the Cambridge University Botanic Garden and the city centre stands this smart Victorian terraced house, close to the station, Addenbrookes and a number of excellent schools. Much-improved and extended, it offers a light, bright, spacious interior and plenty of p..."
"A beautifully refurbished, extended, bay fronted, 4 bedroom Victorian house of 1353sq ft in a lovely position This Victorian home has been refurbished throughout by the current owners and now provides excellent family accommodation across 3 floors which includes: An entrance hall with o..."
"A substantial and elegant Victorian townhouse in a commanding position on this ever popular and highly sought after location, with flexible accommodation set over 4 floors, in need of some sympathetic improvement and updating and is currently used as a house of multiple occupancy. One of four ava..."
"We are excited to offer this impressive three bedroom duplex apartment located in the heart of Cambridge. The property is an easy walk to the city centre, where you will the Grand Arcade shopping centre as well as the whole host of restaurants and shops that the city has to offer."
A classic bay-fronted Victorian house providing stylish and extended accommodation approaching 1200 sq ft with a west-facing rear garden close to Castle Hill and Jesus Green.
"An elegant Victorian townhouse providing characterful accommodation approaching 1200 sq ft with the benefit of an internal courtyard, west-facing walled garden and double garage. The property occupies a privileged position along Ferry Path, moments from the river and Midsummer Common."
"An impressive family townhouse of excellent proportions of around 160 sqm / 1726 sqft, located and conveniently positioned just off Long Road. It is within walking distance to nearby schools and a 6 minute cycle to the Addenbrooke's Campus."
"RECEIVE A £60,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS EITHER YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING COSTS. Only two of these superb homes remaining, both offer a self-contained studio which occupies the space above the garage."
"RECEIVE A £60,000 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE. PLUS A FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN AND FLOORING THROUGHOUT AS STANDARD, INCLUDING AMTICO TO SELECTED ROOMS. Semi-detached 1867 square feet home spread across three floors benefitting from a SELF CONTAINED STUDIO ABOVE YOUR DOUBLE GARAGE. Open-pla..."
"A wonderful chain free Grade II Listed period home in a prime central location, providing spacious and well proportioned rooms, benefitting from a number of fine original style features including high ceilings. Comprising three bedrooms, two spacious reception rooms & generous front & rea..."
A significant home in the heart of Petersfield with nearly 2000 sq ft of accommodation including the side extension annexe and detached garden office/studio. The property requires complete modernisation and benefits from car port parking and no upward chain.
"*Best and Final Offers by 13:00, Tuesday 4th April* This five-bedroom home, built in 2021, boasts a high standard of construction and design, with attention to detail evident throughout the property. The main bedroom is a true master suite, featuring ample space and privacy, with a large walk-..."
"A stunning city home with beautifully updated accommodation over three floors in a sought after residential location. There are 4 good bedrooms, 2 modern bathrooms and stylish living space in addition to a superb open plan kitchen/dining room with vaulted ceiling, utility room and cloakroom."
Substantial double fronted modern detached house providing versatile and well proportioned accommodation with potential for sympathetic updating and enlargement subject to planning consent being granted. The property occupies an outstanding position within a tranquil and most desirable cul-de-sac...
"A four storey semi detached Victorian town house in this popular City location, with large rear garden and off road parking."
Attractive detached Victorian house in a secluded city position.
"A 4-bedroom townhouse with a refitted kitchen, garden, garage and no chain, situated in a popular development close to the river. This modern townhouse has accommodation of about 1627sq.ft across 3 floors. On the ground floor, a covered porch leads to the hallway with ceramic floor tiles..."
"An extended 1920’s semi-detached family home with four bedrooms, four reception rooms and a self-contained annexe, offering a comfortable and spacious living accommodation located north of Cambridge in the highly sought-after school catchment"
"A well-presented three bedroom family home allowing easy and convenient access to City Centre, with local schooling, amenities and convenient transport links to A14, M11 and A11"
Plot 2 is a spacious four bedroom detached house with study and single garage
"Nestled in the heart of the charming city of Cambridge, 52 Gwydir Street is a true gem that seamlessly blends Victorian charm with modern updates. The property is located off Mill Road, just 0.8 miles to the rail station. This double-fronted end terrace was constructed around 1900 using Cambridge..."
"A stunning Victorian terrace house extended and sympathetically improved, set within beautiful landscaped garden with panoramic views over the River Cam"
"A substantial semi-detached, current house of multiple occupation available to the North of the Cambridge City Centre. All rooms are currently tenanted, with the current owner benefitting from a strong yield, making this a delightful proposition for any investment. The property is bei..."
"A beautifully presented Townhouse of 1696 sqft / 157 sqm, enjoying a delightful position in Chesterton with picturesque views over St Andrew’s Church and for sale with no onward chain."
"An impressive and well proportioned home with off street parking and a private south east facing garden, enjoying a quiet near central position within striking distance of the City centre."
Stunning 3 bedroom apartment with panoramic views of Cambridge's Parker's Piece. Situated in the tower portion of the Parkside Place development.
"A characterful Victorian townhouse, situated in one of the most highly sought-after streets in the Kite, a stone’s throw from an extensive range of amenities and available with no onward chain."
"A well proportioned bay fronted detached 1930's residence offering versatile accommodation over three floors occupying a most desirable location within the popular De Freville Avenue area of the city close to a good range of local amenities as well as Midsummer Common, the city centre and the Riv..."
A rarely available opportunity to purchase a detached house which is believed to date back to the 1930s which is situated on a large plot on a popular residential road to the north of the city centre. The property requires complete refurbishment and offers much scope for further development. 
"A superb investment opportunity located within a short walk to the historic Cambridge City Centre, in the form of a fully compliant and managed HMO, on Elizabeth Way, Cambridge, adjacent to the De Freville conservation area. Providing a strong annual rental yield after costs, with fur..."
"A beautifully presented home with the benefit of full planning permission for a ground floor rear and three story side extensions and a loft dormer bedroom with en-suite in a sought after location just a short walk from the mainline railway station and within easy reach of the city centre, Addenb..."
"A Modernist townhouse with a west-facing garden, garage and parking. The property enjoys a peaceful position in the ever-popular Newnham district"
"Located on the edge of Cambridge in Fen Ditton is this spacious detached house of 171 sqm / 1841 sqft in need of improvement, set back from the road with a generous 30m / 98ft rear garden."
"A well-positioned and imposing detached bungalow set within a large plot just to the south of the Cambridge city centre on Coldhams Lane, Cherry Hinton. This immaculately presented home boasts four-bedrooms, two bathrooms, including an en-suite to master, off-road parking for several vehicles and..."
"Constructed by the Eaden Lilley department store for its employees in the late 1800’s, this attractive Victorian townhouse offers larger than usual accommodation arranged over three floors. The property benefits from a south-westerly facing rear garden and is situated in the popular riverside are..."
A substantial Victorian semi-detached house together with a delightful long rear garden enjoying wonderful views to rear over Downing College playing fields in this sought after street in Newnham. The property provides versatile accommodation.
"An attractive bay-fronted Edwardian home with driveway, parking and a private garden, situated in the ever-popular Hurst Park Estate, within striking distance of the river and City Centre."
An immaculately presented and well-proportioned semi-detached residence forming part of this small select development just off Milton Road in a most convenient setting for access to the science park and Cambridge North station.
"A contemporary three bedroom, two bathroom home situated south of Cambridge in the favourable location of Trumpington, benefiting from excellent transport links to M11, A10, the guided busway and close proximities to Addenbrookes Hospital and the mainline railway station"
"Plot 42, The Gibson is a 4 bedrooms semi - detached home with garden, single carport and driveway parking."
"A substantial Victorian semi detached home currently configured as a licensed house of multiple occupancy situated just off the popular Mill Road. The property comprises six bedrooms all with en-suite shower rooms as well as a communal room and kitchen, the rental income is £3480pcm which is..."
"A bay-fronted, Victorian townhouse that is beautifully proportioned and is situated within a highly sought-after area on Trafalgar Road within a stone's throw of the River Cam, Midsummer Common and Jesus Green, as well as an array of local amenities. The home provides two large reception rooms wi..."
"A thoughtful and beautifully appointed bay-fronted house with parking and a west-facing garden, enjoying a cul-de-sac position in this secure development close to the heart of Romsey."
"A three-bedroom semi-detached Edwardian period property arranged over three floors, with off-road parking and an insulated summerhouse, ideally located to the city centre, North train station and within walking distance to the River Cam, Jesus Green and Midsummers Common"
"A simply sensational property that would make the ideal home for any family. With a stunning open-plan living room/kitchen, a separate spacious living room and three comfortable double bedrooms, one of which has a dressing room, there is plenty of space to enjoy and relax. There is..."
A well proportioned three bedroom semi detached family home on Beaumont Road. The property offers fantastic scope for modernisation and improvement with further opportunity to extend (STP).
"SAVE £34,000 - KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES + FLOORING + £34,000 CASH INCENTIVE. ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. *PLOT 273 - THE OAKINGTON AT DARWIN GREEN*. The Oakington is designed over three floors creating a home for flexible modern living. Your ground floor..."
HOUSE TO SELL? ASK US ABOUT OUR PART EXCHANGE GUARANTEE SCHEME. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT. *PLOT 275 - THE OAKINGTON AT DARWIN GREEN*. The Oakington is designed over three floors creating a home for flexible modern living. Your ground floor has a modern open-plan...
"End terrace townhouse with 1,306 sq ft of accommodation over 3 floors."
A well presented extended and improved four bedroom detached family home offering expansive accommodation in-excess of 149 sqm / 1602 sqft located in the heart of this popular village within easy walking distance of The Spinney School and High Street amenities. Fronting a small green area.
"Three storey modern semi detached with enclosed garden, driveway parking and garage with no onward chain"
"The Thornton is a spacious four bedroom detached family home designed for modern living. An open-plan kitchen with a dining area and a utility room on the ground floor. French doors via the generous dual-aspect lounge lead to the rear garden. Three double bedrooms, the main with en suite, are on ..."
"A flexible three storey home with 4 bedrooms, open plan kitchen/dining/family area and separate living room. CONTACT BIDWELLS FOR FURTHER INFORMATION."
"SAVE £36,000 - KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES + FLOORING + £36,000 CASH INCENTIVE. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. MOVE IN THIS SPRING. *PLOT 268 - THE THORNEY AT DARWIN GREEN*. The Thorney is a four bedroom home designed across three floors. The open-plan kitchen features dining and family a..."
"Plot 46 - The Sharland is a four bedroom semi-detached house with an open plan kitchen/dining room with patio doors leading to private garden, and separate living room."
"A highly sought after two bedroom, two bathroom modern apartment, with views over the river in central Cambridge. The property features an entrance hall, leading to an open plan living space, with a wrap around balcony overlooking Midsummer common and the River Cam. The open plan kitche..."
"A substantial and imposing four bedroom link-detached home in an immaculate condition, with off-road parking, garage and fantastic eco efficiencies, set in the keenly sought after village of Girton within the development of Wellbrook Way"
"SAVE £36,000 - KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES + FLOORING + £36,000 CASH INCENTIVE. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. *PLOT 191 - THE WILBURTON AT DARWIN GREEN*. This four bedroom home has an open plan kitchen with a dining area and French doors to the garden. In the kitchen you'll also find a h..."
HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD | HOUSE TO SELL? WE COULD BE YOUR CASH BUYER. VISIT US TO FIND OUT MORE | *PLOT 235 - THE WILBURTON AT DARWIN GREEN*. This four bedroom family home has an open plan kitchen with family area and French doors to the garden. In the kitchen you will find a handy utility...
"*RESERVING NOW* The Wilburton features open-plan living, 3 bedrooms, 2 bath/shower rooms (1 en suite). CONTACT BIDWELLS FOR FURTHER INFORMATION."
VISIT OUR SHOW HOME - Plot 25 is a spacious three bedroom home with single car port for parking. Click through to find out more!
"A brand new 3 bedroom detached house boasting 1,217 Sq Ft of living accommodation, set within a vibrant new community. With garden and parking space."
"Impressive 3 bedroom modern apartment, situated just off Hills Road within the prestigious, gated Marque House development."
"Flexible three storey living with open plan kitchen, diner and seating area."
"SAVE £34,000 - FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN + FLOORING + £34,000 CASH INCENTIVE. SOUTH WEST FACING GARDEN. MOVE IN THIS SPRING. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT. *PLOT 198 - THE HAVERSHAM AT DARWIN GREEN*. This four bedroom home townhouse has a spacious open-plan kitchen wi..."
"This beautifully modern, newbuild terraced house benefits from an expansive open plan design to incorporate modern family living."
"Just launched - a brand new collection of 3 bedroom Shared Ownership houses in Cambridge. Register your interest to find out more! £266,250 for a 50% share. Full market value £532,500. "
"A modern three storey semi-detached townhouse in a highly regarded location close to supermarkets, schooling, the Addenbrookes hospital biomedical campus and the M11. This well appointed property features 4 bedrooms and 2 bathrooms in addition to a large garage. Sold with the advantage of no upwa..."
"A unique opportunity to purchase this end of terrace three storey townhouse, ideal for renovation, positioned just off Barton Road in the highly desirable Newnham district of the city."
An exceptional detached eco family home with solar panels in a new community situated East of the City of Cambridge. 
"An impressive 3 bedroom, first floor apartment providing stylish and spacious accommodation. The property further benefits from two large balconies as well as a secure under croft parking space."
"A well presented, 1930's 3 bedroom, semi detached house, situated for easy access to Cambridge city centre and the mainline railway station."
"SAVE £34,000 -  FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN + FLOORING + £34,000 CASH INCENTIVE. MOVE IN THIS SPRING. SOUTH WEST FACING GARDEN. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT. *PLOT 5 - THE STAMBOURNE AT DARWIN GREEN* The Stambourne features a kitchen, dining and family area with french..."
The Stambourne is a three storey townhosue with kitchen and living/dining room with doors to teh garden. Impressive main bedroom suite on the top floor.
"HOUSE TO SELL? WE COULD BE YOUR CASH BUYER^. OVERLOOKING ALLOTMENTS. ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. *PLOT 272 - THE STAMBOURNE AT DARWIN GREEN*. The Stambourne is a three storey townhouse. Your ground floor has a modern open-plan layout and features a kitchen, dining..."
"SAVE £32,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) The Stambourne is a three storey home. Your ground floor has a modern open-plan layout and features a kitchen, dining and family area with French doors that open out onto your rear garden. Completing your ground floor is a WC and spacious unde..."
"SAVE £32,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) The Stambourne is a 3 bedroom home. The ground floor consists of a separate kitchen, WC & lounge/dining area with French doors leading to the fully turfed rear garden. The first floor consists of two double bedrooms and the family bathroom. Th..."
ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. CORNER PLOT. SOUTH FACING GARDEN. *PLOT 205 - THE HEMINGFORD AT DARWIN GREEN*. The Hemingford is filled with natural light. Your ground floor compromises of an open-plan kitchen with dining space benefitting from a handy store cupboard....
** NOW OPEN THURSDAY TO MONDAY - CONTACT BIDWELLS TO BOOK YOUR APPOINTMENT ** A three bedroom three storey house with study and garage.
"SAVE £32,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) This three bedroom home offers a light and spacious open-plan kitchen with French doors opening onto the garden. On the ground floor there is also a cloakroom, storage cupboard and a study/4th bedroom, perfect for working from home. On the fir..."
"SAVE £34,000 -  FULLY INTEGRATED KITCHEN + FLOORING + £34,000 CASH INCENTIVE. SOUTH WEST FACING GARDEN. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT. *PLOT 202 - THE HEMINGFORD AT DARWIN GREEN* The Hemingford features an open-plan kitchen diner with French doors that open out onto ..."
An outstanding and stylish ground floor maisonette forming part of this attractive Edwardian property with its large garden and abundance of period features in this highly sought after location. The property which has been thoughtfully extended and upgraded throughout is conveniently placed for a...
REQUEST YOUR VIRTUAL TOUR! A stylish and beautifully presented third floor apartment situated off Hills Road within this highly regarded development.
"Charming Grade II listed detached cottage, situated in the highly desirable village of Fen Ditton."
"Bay-fronted Edwardian home within the popular city of Cambridge. This home has been renovated to a good standard and would make a lovely home given its well-proportioned accommodation arranged over two floors, and an enclosed rear garden with gated access. **Please note: Viewings only availab..."
A well-presented and enlarged inner terrace bay fronted townhouse with enclosed facing garden
A charming two-bedroom Victorian cottage located in central Kite providing 750 sq ft of characterful accommodation and a delightful courtyard rear garden.
"*NEW RELEASE* Fantastic THIRD FLOOR two-bedroom apartment in EDDINGTON with UNDERFLOOR HEATING, Fully fitted KITCHEN with INTEGRATED appliances, SECURE basement PARKING, Industrial style TRIPLE GLAZING, SUSTAINABLE features, Private BALCONY."
"A well presented and extended 5 bedroom house located in Trumpington, conveniently located close to the city centre and Addenbrooke's Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
"A rather unique and peacefully positioned Victorian house with parking and a west-facing courtyard garden, located down a private lane just north of the river."
"An opportunity for investors to acquire a contemporary self-contained studio apartment set in the exclusive development of Mallory House, designed as a purpose built space for students with ease of access to all University of Cambridge Colleges and a short walk to Anglia Ruskin University"
"Positioned on the edge of this highly acclaimed development to the South of the city and nestled in a peaceful cul-de-sac location, is this bright, spacious and welcoming, three bedroom modern family home, which boasts accommodation arranged over two floors approaching 1100 sq ft. Your attenti..."
"EV CHARGING POINT. HIGH SPECIFICATION AS STANDARD. *PLOT 239 - THE KIMBOLTON AT DARWIN GREEN* The 3 bedroom Kimbolton features a large open-plan kitchen with dining space. On your ground floor you'll also find a spacious lounge, WC and a storage cupboard. Upstairs, you'll find two double bedrooms..."
Plot 9 is a spacious three bedroom semi-detached house with private rear garden and two allocated car parking spaces.
"Introducing Phoenix, a brand new development of just 13 apartments located off Newmarket Road in Cambridge."
"A well-proportioned and recently renovated Victorian home of 1025 sqft / 96 sqm, situated in the desirable Kite Area. The property has residents parking for 2 vehicles, a west-facing garden and is available with no chain."
MODERN THREE BEDROOM HOUSE CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE situated in the heart of Cambridge. Walking distance of the City Centre and the Beehive Centre retail park. This property is spread across four floors with the kitchen/ dining area and WC on the ground floor and living room and utility area on t...
"An impressive and substantial three / four bedroom house located to the east of the city centre, benefitting from a garden and off street parking. This property is situated in a quiet yet central location, with easy access to the city centre and the A14. "
A Five Bedroom HMO located in Fen Ditton. Includes a spacious kitchen and two bathrooms with a large rear garden. Offering a great investment opportunity. 
"** NOW OPEN THURSDAY TO MONDAY - BOOK YOUR APPOINTMENT ** The Mews has a spacious open-plan kitchen/dining area, two double bedrooms and parking space."
"SAVE £29,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) The Mews is a 2 bedroom home with a spacious open-plan kitchen/dining area. The first floor features two double bedrooms, the main bedroom with en suite, family bathroom & a triple-aspect lounge with French doors leading to the large terrace a..."
"SAVE £29,000 ON YOUR MOVE, PLUS FLOORING (T&Cs Apply) The Mews is a 2 bedroom home. The ground floor focuses on the open-plan kitchen/dining area. The first floor features two double bedrooms, the main bedroom with en suite, family bathroom & a triple-aspect lounge with French doors leading to th..."
"** INVESTORS ONLY ** Stylish two bedroom ground floor apartment, with private courtyard garden, situated within striking distance from Cambridge Railway Station."
An established 1930’s semi-detached house with a 65ft south-east facing garden. The property enjoys a peaceful position just off the Huntingdon Road and is available with no onward chain.
"Forming part of the award winning Accordia development, constructed in 2010, is this stunning two-double bedroom first floor apartment, within the highly acclaimed Copper Building, providing circa 930 square feet of light and airy accommodation, providing any buyers with good access to local amen..."
"A newly renovated and updated 2/3 bedroom end of terrace home, available with no onward chain. The property features, an entrance hall, leading to a good sized lounge with bay window and fireplace. There is an extra reception room, currently used as a bedroom but would also be suitable for a..."
"A characterful and well-proportioned Victorian residence with a private south-facing garden, enjoying an enviable location in Newtown, moments from Hills Road and The Botanic Gardens."
"A well presented, 1930s terraced house, situated in this central location and benefitting from easy access to the city centre, Cambridge Science Park and Cambridge North Railway Station. NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"[For refurbishment or further development (STPP)] - A rare opportunity to purchase this sizeable four bedroom detached house situated on an established, elevated plot measuring approximately 0.14ac in the heart of Cherry Hinton, in need of full modernisation and refurbishment throughout."
A detached home providing spacious accommodation throughout located within a prime residential location off Milton Road within easy walking distance of the river Cam and Historic centre. No Chain.
"A spacious and modern semi-detached family home within the recently formed development of Darwin Green, Cambridge, CB3 on the well regarded Beagle Road. The accommodation boasts circa 832 square feet of bright and airy accommodation, with off-road parking for multiple cars to the front and an enc..."
"A modern three bedroom, two bathroom semi-detached property situated within the development of Darwin Green, ideally located to the A14 and M11 road networks and within nearby reach to Cambridge North Station, Guided Busway and Business Parks"
A beautifully presented 90 SqM two bedroom ground floor apartment in a converted property with private walled courtyard garden and allocated off-street parking space. Benefits from solar PV panels and air source heat pump electric heating. Attractive home or investment with potential monthly ren...
"An extended and renovated house with a south-west facing garden and large driveway, a stone’s throw from the Outstanding Ofsted rated St Bede’s Inter-Church School and for sale with no chain."
"Located in the highly sought after Aura Development on the south side of the City Centre, this Three Bedroom Family House is available on a Shared Ownership basis."
A 1930's semi-detached family home in need of modernising in a sought after South city location close to Addenbrookes hospital and within easy reach of the railway station.
"A contemporary three bedroom mid terrace property situated in a gated development close to a wealth of amenities and walking distance to the railway station, sold with the advantage of no onward chain"
A wonderful opportunity to own a modern and extremely versatile four bedroom mid terrace property located in the desirable south of Cambridge. The property is being sold with the advantage of no onward chain
"A well presented and extended end of terrace home offering spacious accommodation, a beautiful mix of modern and period features throughout, off street parking and large rear garden."
A bay-fronted Victorian house of about 1163 sq.ft. with 2 double bedrooms and an extended kitchen and south-facing garden. This classic Victorian house has good size rooms and lots of original characters and features. The accommodation includes: A hallway with stairs and storage belo...
"A bay-fronted Victorian mid-terrace house located on Kingston Street providing excellent potential for expansion, moments from Mill Road and Cambridge Station. Offered for sale with no onward chain."
"This unique, exceptionally spacious and bright modern home is located in the heart of Chesterton, Cambridge, and is nestled in the corner of an attractive 2007 mews development of nine individual units off Chesterton High Street.  With three large double bedrooms, two ba..."
"A 2 bed maisonette with off street parking located in CB1. Built by award winning developer Hill Residential, this brand new home also comes with a private terrace."
Plot 256 - A brand new TWO BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE ready to move in early 2023 in the growing community at Marleigh. Over 80% Sold
"A brand new 2 bedroom terraced house boasting 898 Sq Ft of living accommodation, set within a vibrant new community. With garden and parking space."
"ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT. IDEAL CORNER PLOT. FIRST TME BUYER? PAY ZERO STAMP DUTY FEES ON THIS HOME. *PLOT 206 - THE AMBER AT DARWIN GREEN* Inside the Amber home you’ll find the spacious, open-plan lounge, dining area and fitted kitchen make a great space for entertaining family and friends. O..."
A superb Victorian city home in a sought after location close to the railway station and city centre with spacious and light accommodation which has been extended and improved in recent years. Lovely enclosed rear garden and no upward chain.
"REQUEST YOUR VIRTUAL TOUR! A stylish terraced house, well situated in the highly acclaimed Trumpington Meadows development, conveniently placed for access to the M11 and Addenbrooke’s Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
An immaculately presented Victorian mid terraced home having been completely refurbished by the current owners. This fine city home retains many character features alongside modern fittings and is offered for sale with no upward chain. An internal viewing is absolutely essential.
"Just launched - a brand new collection of 3 bedroom Shared Ownership houses in Cambridge. Register your interest to find out more! Full market value £532,500. Prices start from £159,750 for a 30% share. "
"An extended 3 bedroom semi-detached house, with parking, a garage, a south-east facing garden, and no chain. This lovely family house does need some updating but has been extended and has surprisingly spacious accommodation and good size bedrooms. Downstairs there is a porch, a hallway a..."
"A well proportioned three/four bedroom semi detached home, that has been extended on the ground floor to provide a third reception room/fourth bedroom, which could easily make an annexe or possible home office. Located in the heart of Chesterton, the house is set on a good sized plot with ample..."
"A recently renovated three bedroom family home, set within ever popular Spinney School catchment and boasts a generous rear garden with single garage. No Forward Chain."
"An extended and very well-proportioned three bedroom semi-detached family home situated on the edge of the sought-after village of Girton, offering excellent access to village amenities plus transport links into Cambridge via-Huntingdon Road."
Presented with no onward chain is this Four bedroom property occupying approximately 1230 sq ft of accommodation across three floors in the popular Orchard Park development of North Cambridge.
"**Was £525,000, reduced to £500,000** A 3/4 bedroom terraced house, available with no onward chain! The property features, an entrance hall, leading to a good sized reception room, currently being used as a bedroom, open plan lounge/ dining area, fitted kitchen and conservat..."
"*Best and Final Offers by 13:00, Thursday 6th April* A very well-presented, three-bedroom, mid-terraced home located on Union Lane. The property offers great transport links, being situated just 2 miles from Cambridge North rail station and equidistant to the city centre. The brick-built home ..."
"A very smart and spacious apartment of 84 sqm / 904 sqft with undercroft parking and balcony, located around a 6 minute cycle to the Addenbrooke's Campus and 2 minutes to the Guided Busway cycle route which leads you in to the city centre. CHAIN FREE"
"A beautifully presented three-bedroom semi-detached home, situated in the ever popular village of Fen Ditton. This period property is located conveniently for access to both the M11 and the A14 as well as offering a direct route to the heart of central Cambridge via Newmarket Road. Fen Ditton is ..."
"A light and airy, four bedroom semi detached property offering a practically designed family home set over three floors. The property forms part of the desirable Orchard Park development ideally located to the A14, Science Park, and sold with the benefit of no onward chain"
Delightful and characterful two bedroom flat with communal gardens and parking situated in one of the City’s prime residential areas. The property is offered with no onward chain. 
"A superb two bedroom duplex apartment, completed to a high specification offering spacious and bright accommodation with a south facing balcony to the rear and secure off street parking. No chain."
"A stylish contemporary town house with well presented accommodation arranged over three floors and situated on this popular residential development just to the north of the city. This fine family home is well located offering easy access to Cambridge city centre, a wide range of local amenities,..."
"A well-proportioned Victorian end of terrace providing versatile accommodation including 2 reception rooms and 3 bedrooms and occupying a prominent position in this most desirable street just to the south of the city, so conveniently placed for local amenities, the mainline train station and Adde..."
A charming refurbished two double bedroom mid-terraced Victorian house situated in this sought-after area of Cambridge offering excellent access to local amenities and the city centre.
"A charming two bedroom Victorian home, benefitting from a number of period features, giving quick & easy access to the many amenities of Mill Road, Addenbrooke's and the city centre. The property benefits from two reception rooms and a pleasant back garden with rear access. "
"A well proportioned detached family home requiring some updating situated in a popular residential location offering easy access to Cambridge city centre, Science Park and A14. The property was built in 1952 and has been owned by the same family from new."
READY TO MOVE INTO! A 2 bed first floor apartment located on the first floor with private balcony built by award winning developer Hill Residential.
"An extended and improved semi-detached house with 4 large bedrooms, 2 reception rooms, re-fitted kitchen and stylish bathroom. There is driveway parking at the front and a large corner plot garden to the rear. Sold with the advantage of no upward chain."
A well represented 2 bedroom apartment in this prime central city location.
"A handsome and established, bay-fronted Victorian residence offering stylish and well-proportioned accommodation, with a collection of remaining original features and a low maintenance garden, all situated on this quiet residential street, just off the thriving Mill Road."
"In arguably one of the most pleasant locations in the City over looking meadowland and the River Cam, just under two miles from the City centre, with Cambridge North railway station one and a half miles away. The property features a balcony taking in the peace and quiet the location brings, with ..."
"Three bedroom end of terrace property set over three floors with off-road parking, a spacious L-shaped garden and a large summerhouse equipped with power, situated north of Cambridge within close proximity to the Business and Science Parks, North Station and the city centre"
The property is light and airy and offers well-proportioned accommodation over two floors with south facing balcony and views over the manicured quadrangle.
"A superbly located two-bedroom duplex apartment, within the highly regarded development of Highsett, on Hills Road Cambridge. Offering circa 750 square feet of bright and airy accommodation, this home offers the perfect residential purchase, just a ten-minute walk from the historic Cambridge City..."
"A spacious and well-presented, three-bedroom, semi-detached property is a perfect family home, situated conveniently close to the Science Park, North Train Station, and City Centre. Upon entering the property, you are welcomed into a bright and inviting hallway leading to two well-proportioned re..."
"Contemporary two double bedroom apartment with two bathrooms and private balcony situated within this highly regarded Magna development, standing in a most convenient south city location. Available to investors only."
"An attractive period home, offering spacious accommodation, on street parking and garden, located just off Mill Road nearby an ambiance of local amenities, the train station and the city centre."
"A bright and improved Townhouse of 106 sqm / 1150 sqft, with a carport and 2 parking spaces. The property is close to the A14 / M11 road networks and is for sale with no chain."
"A smartly presented and spacious two bedroom apartment, occupying a prominent position on the 3rd floor of this high specification development."
"Period city home, situated in a desirable residential address, just off Huntingdon Road."
"A well-proportioned and pleasantly presented three bedroom first floor maisonette set over two floors, situated in a popular location just a short cycle ride from the Science Parks and North Station, sold with share of freehold and with the benefit of no onward chain"
"A rather unique Victorian home with a 67ft garden and a useful outbuilding with power and lighting, enjoying an enviable position in Petersfield, a short walk from Cambridge Station."
"A well presented, two bedroom first floor apartment with modern, spacious accommodation throughout, a large linear balcony enjoying a sunny aspect and allocated, secure parking. Offered with no chain."
A fourth floor 2 bedroom apartment within 790 sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"Buy with a 5% deposit* - Plot D34 is a two bedroom fourth floor city apartment, ready to move in Spring 2023, in the heart of Cambridge"
A charming two/three bedroom mid-terraced Victorian residence enjoying a near central city location central.
"An excellent ground floor apartment in Newnham - one of Cambridge's most sought after neighbourhoods - providing smart, very well presented and spacious accommodation, comprising two bedrooms, modern kitchen and shower room and benefitting from pleasant communal gardens and the right to park off ..."
"New to the market, a two bedroom, two bathroom modern apartment offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property features, an entrance hall, leading to a light and spacious, open plan living space, with a modern fitted kitchen. There is a large, private balcony looking out onto greenery and trees...."
"A well presented first floor apartment offering spacious accommodation throughout with two generous double bedrooms, master with en-suite, Beautiful high ceilings, wrap around south/west facing balcony and under croft parking."
"A Victorian terraced home in a quiet residential cul-de-sac in the heart of Romsey, just a short walk to all the independent shops and cafes of Mill Road. Accommodation includes 3 bedrooms, 2 reception rooms, kitchen/breakfast room and first floor shower room with the property benefiting from a d..."
"A superbly presented two double bedroom duplex-apartment within the heart of the CB1 postcode, in the attractive and modern development of Flamsteed Close. The property would suit any investor, with tenants currently in situ and a good rental income being achieved. Offering 784 square feet of bri..."
"Well-proportioned modern three bedroom terraced house within a highly regarded residential area, just off Milton Road"
A ground floor 2 bedroom apartment within 791 sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"Buy with a 5% deposit* - Plot D43 is a two bedroom fifth floor city apartment, ready to move in Spring 2023, in the heart of Cambridge"
"A three-bedroom, semi-detached house, located in a quiet cul-de-sac on the south-east side of the city. The property is just a short walk from Cherry Hinton High Street, making it an ideal location for those who want to be close to amenities. This home has been improved by the current owners and ..."
A three/four bedroom property with the added benefit of a recently built annex/studio in the Kings Hedges area of North Cambridge.
"A large two bedroom, two bathroom duplex apartment located in central Cambridge, minutes away from Cambridge City Station with PARKING!"
"A spacious two bedroom apartment situated within a short distance of the City Centre, mainline railway station and Addenbrooke’s Hospital."
"An immaculate three-bedroom semi-detached family home boasting a corner position with plenty of off-road parking, within a sought after residential development in Cherry Hinton close to local schooling for all ages and a range of amenities"
"In central Cambridge is this smart first floor flat, part of a development with dedicated parking and a communal garden. Located close to the Common, River Cam and Jesus Green, it is the perfect place from which to walk or cycle to work. Immaculate within, it has one reception room, one bathroom ..."
"A 3 bedroom semi-detached property in a popular location and conveniently placed for access to the railway station, science parks and the city centre."
"Hockeys are proud to present this beautifully upgraded three-bedroom terraced property located in the North of Cambridge. Ideal for families or as an investment opportunity, this property offers convenient access to the city centre,"
"A modern semi-detached family home benefiting from good size rear garden and no onward chain. The property which is located in a popular residential development occupies a cul-de-sac location and is conveniently placed for access to Cambridge city centre, Cambridge North railway station, Science ..."
"An immaculately presented three bedroom detached home in a condition ready to move in, benefiting from off-road parking and a garage equipped with power and lighting, offered for sale with the advantage of no onward chain"
"A highly versatile, three-storey- townhouse situated within the Orchard Park development on the northern side of Cambridge with excellent access to the Cambridge North Station, Science Park and A14. The properties accommodation comprises five bedrooms with two having an en-suite, a large L shaped..."
A much improved and well-presented 1920s built mid-terraced home with open plan ground floor living accommodation on a popular residential road to the south of the city centre. The property benefits from re-fitted modern kitchen and bathroom fittings. Internal viewing is strongly recommended. EPC...
"Three-bedroom semi-detached family home located north of Cambridge, walking distance to local primary and secondary schooling and conveniently placed for access to the A14, Science Park, North Station and the Guided Busway. The property is sold with the benefit of no onward chain"
"A 2 bedroom Victorian house providing nicely presented accommodation with a west facing garden, in the heart of Romsey Town within easy walking distance of the train station and city centre and Addenbrookes hospital biomedical campus."
"An extremely well proportioned 2 bedroom first floor apartment within this prestigious South City development with easy access to Addenbrooke's, railway station and the historic city centre as well benefitting further from an allocated parking space within secure underground car park and use of r..."
A two/three bedroom Victorian residence enjoying a particularly good position within this popular and near central city location
"Quote GH0600 - INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY: Located on a quiet, luxury development; this delightful high-end, two-bedroom first floor apartment is just a 15 minute cycle ride from Cambridge City Centre and is close to the M11 junction for a London commute. A welcoming community entrance hall w..."
"A modern second floor, 2 bedroom apartment conveniently situated for access to a mainline railway station and Cambridge city centre."
"A modern, well presented, two bedroom house off Addenbrooke’s Road providing great links to the south side of the city, Addenbrooke's and the A10/M11."
"A spacious two bedroom duplex apartment located in central Cambridge, minutes away from Cambridge City Station with parking offered chain free."
Built by award winning developer Hill Residential is this 2 bed ground floor apartment which is ready to move into !
PLOT E03 - TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT READY TO MOVE INTO NOW IN THE HEART OF CAMBRIDGE
"Buy with a 5% deposit with Deposit Unlock - Plot D4 is a two bedroom second floor city apartment, ready to move in Spring 2023, in the heart of central Cambridge"
"A well-presented three bedroom semi-detached home situated in the favoured King's Hedges location offering excellent access to local amenities, the Science & Business Parks, Cambridge North station, and the city centre."
A third floor 2 bedroom apartment within 774 sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"A beautifully presented two-bedroom two-bathroom second floor apartment located a stone’s throw from Stourbridge Common, boasting tranquil views from the balcony which overlook the meadowlands and the River Cam. The property benefits from sale with the advantage of no onward chain"
"A two bedroom mid terrace property ideally located to the major retail parks, an excellent range of amenities and the city centre. The property is being sold with the advantage of no onward chain"
"A fantastic modern maisonette arranged over two floors, offering open plan living, a spacious balcony and communal gardens, in this sought-after south city location."
"A beautifully presented 2 bedroom apartment, finished to a high standard, situated within the award winning Trumpington Meadows development, with views over the Country Park."
"A stylish and modern, 2 bedroom apartment, situated in a popular and sought after development, conveniently placed for easy access to Addenbrooke’s Hospital/ Biomedical Campus and Cambridge city centre."
"Well appointed and spacious first floor apartment, located in a select development surrounded by well manicured communal grounds and within walking distance of Addenbrookes Hospital. The south-westerly facing accommodation is being sold with no onward chain and comprises two double bedrooms, an e..."
"A deceptively spacious and well-presented four bedroom family, located within a private courtyard location, set within close proximity to amenities and offered with no forward chain. Further Benefits include master en-suite, garage and home office space."
"A large, light, top floor apartment, in what must be one of the best locations on the Trumpington Meadows development, with a lovely outlook from the main rooms to historic the Anstey Hall and the Parish Church. Offered with no chain."
"A third floor modern two bedroom apartment, located in the popular development of Glenalmond Avenue. The property comprises of entrance hallway with two large storage cupboards. There is a large double bedroom with built in storage space, a second double bedroom and a family bathroom with a showe..."
"A well presented 3 bedroom semi detached house in a pleasant cul de sac, situated with easy access to the City Centre, Cambridge Science Park and Cambridge North Station."
"A well-presented two bedroom mid terrace home situated in the ever popular High Street of Chesterton, close to the North Train Station and walking distance to the city centre and the river. The property is being sold with the advantage of no onward chain"
"A modern and beautifully presented two bedroom detached bungalow. The property features an entrance hall, leading to a large, open plan living space, with a modern fitted kitchen and bi-fold doors opening to a low maintenance courtyard garden. There are two bedrooms, both of which are double..."
"A stylish & well presented unfurnished two bedroom apartment, situated on the 1st floor of a modern development in Trumpington and benefiting from high-spec fixtures and fittings, a stylish and well-equipped kitchen, a good sized private balcony, video entry system, and off street parking."
"A 3 bedroom mid-terrace house that needs complete refurbishment, with a long garden and in a convenient location. This mid-terrace house needs complete refurbishment, but would also extend easily at the rear, and possibly into the roof (subject to approval). The accommodation includes - ..."
A spacious three bedroom end of terrace family home with an enclosed garden located within a quiet cul de sac and has the benefit of a conservatory.
"A two bedroom bay-fronted end of terrace house with a second-floor loft room and enclosed rear garden, located off Mill road and only a short walk to Cambridge Railway Station and excellent facilities."
"A stylish and contemporary fourth floor, one bedroom apartment, located in the coveted Newnham area on the west side of the city of Cambridge."
"This spacious and very well proportioned three bedroom house is located in the popular suburb of Cherry Hinton and gives easy access to local amenities, Cambridge City Centre, as well as the A14 & M11 commuter routes, and is being sold with no ongoing chain. "
This is a charming 2 bedroom Victorian terraced property in a prime location in Central Cambridge. The property has been recently updated with a contemporary style Kitchen and newly fitted Bathroom.York Street is a sought-after road conveniently located to the City's amenities an...
"An established, end terrace home, located close to the city centre and just a stones throw from the Grafton Centre, with a modern kitchen and bathroom and a private rear garden. Offered with no upward chain."
"Placed within an ideal location, close to a variety of amenities, the popular Leisure park development, complete with an IMAX cinema, bowling alley, a variety of restaurants and just a five-minute walk to the central Cambridge station, offering a commuting time to central London in under an hour,..."
"Placed within the attractive location of Oak Tree Avenue, with no through road and adjacent to an abundance of local amenities on the well regarded Milton Road, is this quaint and attractive, three-bedroom mid-terrace residence. The property is set nicely back behind a dedicated driveway wi..."
"Three bedroom end of terrace home with low maintenance gardens set in a quiet neighbourhood just moments from Cherry Hinton high street, schooling and amenities, offered for sold with the benefit of no onward chain"
"A two double-bedroom, modern ground floor apartment, occupying an enviable position within the Cambridge City centre, just five minutes’ walk from the Cambridge Central Station and ten-minutes’ walk from the historic city centre. This property is offered for sale with no onward chain ..."
"*AVAILABLE WITH DEPOSIT UNLOCK* Stunning apartment with UNDERFLOOR HEATING, Fully fitted KITCHEN with INTEGRATED appliances, SECURE basement PARKING, Industrial style TRIPLE GLAZING, High ceiling heights, Private TERRACE, COMMUNAL CO-WORKING SPACES to building. READY TO MOVE INTO MAY 2023"
"A superbly renovated and much improved turn of the century semi detached home, set in the heart of Cherry Hinton, close to numerous shops and amenities. With off-road parking to the rear."
"We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Ground Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. **GUIDE PRICE - £415,000 - £430,000**"
"A modern two bedroom two bathroom ground floor apartment set in the up and coming development Darwin Green located off from Huntington Road, benefiting from allocated parking, an outdoor terrace and close proximity to the A14/M11 road network"
"A well-presented ground floor apartment located within Pym Court, Cambridge and benefitting from two bathrooms and its own garden. This ground floor apartment is located on the fringes of the City Centre off Cromwell Road in Cambridge. The property comprises of a divide between the co..."
"A superb two bedroom apartment offering stylish and contemporary accommodation, situated within the desirable Abode development and conveniently placed for access to Addenbrooke’s Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
"Three bedroom mid terrace property situated in Cherry Hinton, conveniently located to Addenbrooke's Hospital and the city centre, with the ARM and local amenities available within walking distance. The property is offered for sale with the advantage of no onward chain"
"We are pleased to offer this well-presented 2 Bedroom ground floor apartment on a popular side of the city, within walking distance to Addenbrookes Hospital and a 10 minute drive to the train station. Comprising of 2 Double Bedrooms, with an Ensuite, fully fitted kitchen and views over the gre..."
A sixth floor 1 bedroom apartment within 570sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"A rare opportunity to acquire a modern 2 bedroom semi-detached family home, providing beautifully proportioned living accommodation, situated in a popular north city location. Built at the end of 2015 (still under NHBC warranty) 2 double bedrooms, 2 bathrooms (recently renovated), a livin..."
"A three-bedroom semi-detached home located within in the heart of Trumpington, putting you in easy reach of all the local amenities and access to Addenbrooke’s. The home is set back from the road behind a private driveway that offers off road parking for multiple vehicles alongs..."
A spacious second floor apartment within the Highsett development overlooking 'parkland' gardens close to the centre of Cambridge.
Spacious 2 bedroom first floor apartment situated within walking distance of the Grafton Centre & Anglian Ruskin University.
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, this semi-detached home is located within a generous sized corner plot. Originally a three bedroom semi-detached home, the current owner converted the third bedroom to create two bathrooms/shower suites to the first floor. The ground floor compri..."
"A spacious modern apartment situated on the second floor of this purpose built block on the highly sought after ""Vie"" development. This beautifully presented home benefits from a refitted kitchen and bathroom. Offering easy access to the river, city centre and both Cambridge train stations along ..."
"Just launched - a brand new collection of 3 bedroom Shared Ownership houses in Cambridge. Register your interest to find out more! £399,375 for a 75% share. Full market value £532,500. "
"*OPEN DAY Saturday 1st April* By Appointment Only. Please Call to Arrange Now. We are pleased to offer this 2 double Bedroom semi-detached property in a great location close to Addenbrookes and ARM. As you enter the property, on the left is the fitted kitchen: Kit..."
One Bedroom apartment approx 570 Sq ft in the Walnut Tree building. Set around GREEN OPEN SPACE and positioned in the heart of Central Cambridge with a BALCONY overviewing the open green space and perfect for sunrises.
"Tucked away near the end of a cul-de-sac, is this smartly presented, two bedroom semi-detached bungalow with a detached garage, off road parking and no onward chain."
"Three bedroom terraced family home situated in the CB4 region of Cambridge, conveniently placed for access to the city centre and a short cycle ride to North Railway Station and both Science and Business Parks"
"A well-presented, modernised Victorian build with two bedrooms, located on Newmarket Road just 1.5 miles from central Cambridge and 1.3 miles to Cambridge rail station. The property is a mid-terraced home that has been lovingly cared for by the current owners. Totalling approximately 68.2 square ..."
"Presenting a contemporary and stylish two-bedroom end of terrace home that's perfect for first-time buyers or investors. The property boasts a bright and airy living space that opens onto a beautifully landscaped garden through French doors, offering an ideal space for entertaining and relaxing. ..."
"Well placed, this two double bedroom, bespoke built 1960’s top floor apartment boasts natural light throughout and is ideal for any first-time buyers looking to climb onto the property ladder within this ideal location, close to local amenities and the well regarded St. Faith’s School..."
"A wonderful opportunity to own this two double bedroom end of terrace home with a low-maintenance landscaped garden and off-road parking, located in the keenly sought after south of Cambridge region, close to amenities and just a short distance to Addenbrooke’s Hospital"
"A well presented, modern two bedroom top floor apartment offering spacious accommodation throughout. Enjoying far reaching southerly views with a sunny balcony. Allocated parking. No chain."
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £380,000 - £410,000*"
"A beautiful apartment with INDUSTRIAL style floor-to-ceiling windows, private balcony, underfloor heating and contemporary bathrooms with MATT black sanitary ware."
"An immaculately presented, modern two-bedroom apartment with a south facing patio, located within minutes of Trumpington Meadows country park whilst providing great links to the south side of the city, Addenbrooke's and the A10/M11."
"Welcome to this stunning ground floor apartment, located in the heart of central Cambridge. This beautiful two-double bedroom apartment is a superb example of a Victorian terraced house conversion that has been extended to the rear, providing additional living space. Positioned conveniently close..."
"A spacious penthouse apartment, situated within this exclusive development just off Hills Road, complete with a private south-facing roof terrace and unrivalled on-site leisure facilities."
"A modern, 1 bedroom apartment finished to a high standard, situated in the desirable Athena development just a few miles west from Cambridge city centre."
A modern and very well presented two bedroom apartment occupying an enviable upper floor position in this conveniently located development close to the city centre and the railway station. With parking and lift access. Ideal investment.
"COMPLETION EST MID JANUARY 2023! Do not miss one of these two brand new, 1 bedroom, semi detached & freehold properties located on Garden Walk! "
A ground floor 1 bedroom apartment within 570sqft of living accommodation located within The Walnut Tree Building at Timber Works. Built by award winning developers Hill Residential.
"*Sold by Modern Auction (T&Cs apply) *Subject to Undisclosed Reserve Price *Buyer Fees Apply New to the market, a two bedroom, two bathroom top floor apartment within a stone’s throw from Cambridge's mainline train station. The property features, an entrance ha..."
An extended two bedroom terraced house enjoying a cul de sac position within a sought after area of Cherry Hinton.
"SHOW HOME FOR SALE** Stunning GROUND FLOOR suite at Rubicon, Eddington. Offering UNDERFLOOR HEATING, private TERRACE, basement PARKING SPACE & FLOORING included. Plus access to unique CO-WORKING SPACE. Expertly designed and fully furnished - Ready to move into now!"
"Ideally situated in a convenient north city location, a well-proportioned, bright and airy 2-bedroom end of terrace property within easy reach of Cambridge North train station and local amenities. "
An individual light and spacious 2-bedroom top floor apartment within a striking contemporary building providing allocated parking and mature communal gardens located off Cherry Hinton High Street.
"A stunning and spacious ground floor apartment with a floorspace of approximately 71 square metres situated within a prestigious development to the south of the city centre, a short walk from the railway station and near to local shopping and leisure amenities. Living accommodation comprises: two..."
"An exciting opportunity to acquire this well-appointed 2-bedroom apartment, situated just moments from the River Cam and within easy reach of nearby amenities and Cambridge city centre. "
FOR SALE BY LIVESTREAM AUCTION ON THURSDAY 4TH MAY AT 11:00AM TO REGISTER FOR LEGAL PACKS AND BIDDING INSTRUCTIONS PLEASE VISIT OUR WEBSITE 
"A well presented first floor two bedroom apartment in the Kaleidoscope development, well situated for access to the city centre, mainline railway station and Addenbrooke's Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
"Sought-after EDDINGTON location, SUITE offering UNDERFLOOR HEATING, fully fitted KITCHEN, TRIPLE GLAZING, SUSTAINABLE features, private BALCONY, secure underground PARKING, access to CO-WORKING SPACE. VIEW OUR SHOW HOME TODAY!"
"A three bedroom end of terrace house, offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property features an entrance hall, leading to a good sized lounge, a fitted kitchen/diner and downstairs WC. Upstairs, you will find three good sized bedrooms, two of which are doubles, and a family bathroom with a..."
"** CENTRALLY LOCATED ** 1 Bedroom Apartment, in Hills Road, Neutral Decor Throughout, 5mins Walk to Train Station and City Centre. Double Glazing and Gas Central Heating"
"Situated on Paradise Street, only a short walk from the Grafton shopping centre and other local amenities is this stunning two double bedroom apartment. The internal accommodation provides spacious living centred around the open plan living room kitchen/diner and a private shared garden to the re..."
"A beautifully presented and stylish apartment with a private balcony set in a wonderfully central city location, enjoying rooftop views of Cambridge."
"**NO CHAIN** Ready to move into yet with the potential to make your own, this two double bedroom, terraced home situated within the northern part of Cambridge only 1.5 miles from Cambridge North Station and the Science Park. Crathern Way is located between Campkin Road and Northfield Avenue w..."
"If you are looking for a home, set in a great location with stunning views out to parkland. This property offers spacious living, a modern kitchen and bathrooms, a sunny courtyard garden, and a large garage."
"A ground floor apartment set in established grounds on the southern side of the city, convenient for access to Addenbrookes Hospital, the railway station and the city centre. The property is offered for sale with no upward chain and viewing is highly recommended. EPC Rating Band D."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this centrally located split level maisonette located moments from Parkers Piece and the Grafton Centre. Accommodation includes entrance hallway, kitchen, lounge/diner, two bedrooms and shower room. Ideal as an investment property, for sale with no onward chain."
"A modern mid terrace home proving excellent accommodation in-excess of 66 sqm / 718 sqft, two spacious double bedrooms and courtyard gardens to the front and rear."
"A bright and well cared for share of freehold apartment with a garage, surrounded by well-tended communal gardens and offering views over Trinity Hall Sports Ground, for sale with no chain."
"An immaculately presented one bedroom apartment, located on the second floor in this prestigious and modern development, which offers communal spaces including an extremely well-equipped gym and ever-useful concierge service, all positioned perfectly to access the city centre, Addenbrooke's, Camb..."
"A well-presented & modern one-double bedroom end of terrace home within the heart of the CB4 postcode, on Austin Court, adjacent to Arbury Road and on a private no through road development. The property is ideally suited to investors, with a tenant in situ until October 2023 and is being sold..."
"Stunning first floor suite offering open living space and private terrace, located 1.9 miles from Cambridge City Centre."
"Final 2 bed apartments remaining in our current release. Register your interest to book an appointment today! Full market value £340,000. Prices start from £85,000 for a 25% share of a 2 bedroom apartment. "
"**Available to purchase using the DEPOSIT Unlock scheme** A stunning suite, ready to move into, finished to a high specification, with basement parking and electric car charging points. CALL TO VIEW TODAY!"
"A well presented and improved two bedroom, first floor apartment with a garage, located in an excellent position within the development with views of the communal grounds. No chain."
"A bright and immaculately presented, three bedroom, ground floor apartment with well proportioned living space and the benefit of a garage in a nearby block, located off Huntingdon Road, ideally placed for access to Cambridge City Centre and the M11/A14 road networks. The block was constructed in..."
"A 2 double bedroom terraced house in a north city location offering access to the A14, science/business parks and Cambridge north railway station. The property has a generous garden and garage and benefits from double glazing and gas radiator heating."
** SHOW APARTMENT AVAILABLE TO VIEW BY APPOINTMENT **
"Tucker Gardner are delighted to present this immaculate three bedroom, first floor apartment located within Thornton Court, a highly regarded and sought after development situated off Huntingdon Road in Girton. Available CHAIN FREE, the flat is positioned within easy reach of all local amenities ..."
"A 2 bedroom top-floor apartment with ensuite, parking and no chain, situated on the edge of a popular development close to Eddington and the City. This attractive apartment has been well maintained and provides spacious, light accommodation due to its corner position. The home is located..."
"Charming two bedroom top floor apartment with pitched ceilings, exposed beams and brickwork throughout. The accommodation is accessed via a spiral staircase in the main lobby. Upon entry, the hallway provides a home for shoes and coats. The living area is a bright and airy space with two windows ..."
"A superb spacious first floor apartment forming part of a Victorian conversion with planning consent, situated in a convenient location giving easy access to the city centre"
"A one-bedroom, first-floor apartment situated within a popular development of apartments whilst being within walking distance to Midsummer Common and under two miles from Cambridge North Station."
A stylish 1 bedroom terraced house with off road parking and a private garden located off Hartington Grove and around an 8 minute cycle to the Addenbrooke's Campus and Cambridge Train Station.
"
A spacious 2 bedroom apartment with 2 bathrooms in a convenient and popular location ideal for commuters. Cambridge North Station is only a few minutes away with a line into London Liverpool Street. Within 5 minutes walking distance to bus stop, shops and amenities. Offered with no onward chain. "
"An excellent opportunity to purchase this well-proportioned apartment in this highly sought after central location, forming part of this established and select development enjoying the benefit of private parking to the rear, making itself ideal for owner-occupiers as well as investors."
"A beautifully appointed one-bedroom ground floor apartment within a close proximity of the historic Cambridge City Centre. The apartment boasts 484 square feet of modern, easy to maintain accommodation and comes with the benefit of street-side access, a secure courtyard garden and dedicated under..."
"This spacious two-bedroom property boasts spacious and open plan living on the ground floor whilst being positioned within a popular residential area, making it an ideal family home or first time buyer. The home is conveniently situated within close proximity to a comprehensive range of local ame..."
"This first floor duplex apartment offers modern accommodation in a convenient location, within a walking distance to local amenities and the nearby North Cambridge Academy. The ground floor of the property consists of a living/dining room and well-appointed kitchen. Upstai..."
"A well presented, top floor apartment forming part of this excellent development with accommodation exceeding 54sqm/581sqft with easy access to all local amenities and the Country Park."
"Fully renovated Share of Freehold Private parking Close to station Secure bike storage Positioned at the end of a quiet no through road, this first floor one bedroom flat boasts a private parking space and Share of Freehold. Having undergone major refurbishment by the current ow..."
"A beautifully presented and well-proportioned, modern 1 bedroom apartment, conveniently situated within walking distance of Cambridge mainline railway station, the city centre and Addenbrooke's Hospital/Biomedical Campus, all while enjoying the benefits of a concierge, swimming pool and gym exclu..."
"No onward chain. A well-presented ground floor two bedroom apartment with allocated parking in a popular residential location near Cambridge North Station and Cambridge Science and Business Parks. Perfect for commuters, city starter home, pied-a-terre or an ideal investment. "
"Presented to the market is this bright and spacious, detached two double bedroom coach house in the popular Orchard Park development."
A 2 bedroom ground floor apartment in a popular south city location offering convenient access to the Addenbrookes Hospital Biomedical Campus and the railway station. Sold with no upward chain.
** SHOW APARTMENT AVAILABLE TO VIEW. CALL TO MAKE AN APPOINTMENT **
A well presented 3rd floor one bedroom apartment located in the popular Glenalmond Avenue development. Open plan kitchen/living area and balcony accessible from the living room. The entrance hall leads to a double bedroom with two large double wardrobes and a bathroom with bath and separate doubl...
A stylish first floor maisonette offering well presented accommodation forming part of this convenient near central development only a few minutes walk from the train station and a wide range of amenities on Mill Road. The property which benefits from off-street parking features refitted shower r...
"Radcliffe & Rust, estate agents Cambridge, are delighted to present to the market this fantastic ground floor flat located in Enniskillen Road, Cambridge, CB4. Situated close to Chesterton High Street, Enniskillen Road is approximately two and a half miles from the City Centre, well placed for a..."
"An immaculately presented, top floor apartment providing bright, open plan living within the heart of Trumpington, positioned within easy reach of Addenbrooke's and the city centre."
"A well-presented first floor maisonette with a large south facing rear garden, situated on a popular residential road to the south of the city. The property is convenient for access to both Addenbrookes Hospital and Arm Holdings and an internal viewing is strongly recommended. EPC Rating Band C."
"A fantastic opportunity to buy your first home or an investment, top floor apartment located in the south of Cambridge city centre in a sought after location close to Addenbrookes. The second-floor apartments accommodation comprises two bedrooms, a dual aspect living room/kitchen/diner as well as..."
"Light and airy, one bedroom apartment situated in a convenient spot, just a short distance from Cambridge city centre."
"Brown&Co offers a superbly located, three bedroom, second floor apartment for refurbishment in Thornton Court, just off Cambridge's beautiful Huntingdon Road in Girton CB3."
"*Best and Final Offers by 17:00, Monday 20th March* Welcome to this bright and spacious one-bedroom first-floor apartment located in the heart of Cambridge. As you step inside, you will be greeted by an open-plan living area with a modern kitchen that offers plenty of space to entertain guests o..."
A spacious first floor apartment with views over the communal gardens in this sought after and near central development adjacent to the River Cam and Midsummer Common.
"A stylish and well presented, 1 bedroom apartment, conveniently placed for access to Cambridge city centre, Mainline Railway Station and Addenbrooke’s Hospital/Biomedical Campus."
"An extremely well presented top floor apartment, located within the ever popular Orchard Park development. Internal accommodation offers open plan living, modern bathroom and a private balcony bay. Further benefits include allocated parking with fantastic access links into Cambridge, A14 and M11."
"A two-bedroom, first floor apartment that has been completely refurbished. Less than 15 minutes to Cambridge City Centre, Cambridge North Train Station and Cambridge Science Park."
"A beautifully presented studio apartment located in the prestigious Lovell Lodge development to the north of the city. This property offers modern living located close to the train station, science park and A14. The property comprises of an entrance hall leading to an open plan living area with l..."
"A well present ground floor maisonette, nestled within a quiet cul de sac, close to amenities and Cherry Hinton Hall Park. This property is an ideal first time purchase or investment, with benefits to include residents communal parking and gardens."
A ONE BEDROOM TOP FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT BENEFITING FROM OWN BALCONY OVERLOOKING FRONT OF THE DEVELOPMENT Epworth Court is in the centre of Cambridge. Across the road is a parade of local shops including Post office and a bus stop. Supermarket along with the Grafton Shopping centre is a sh...
A well proportioned two bedroom apartment with an en suite shower room to the main bedroom and parking to the rear
"A ground floor one bedroom apartment sitting comfortably in this established retirement development suitable for over 60s, offering use of a wide range of communal areas alongside resident management staff and Careline alarm service, all situated in this highly popular central location."
"A beautifully presented first floor flat, with views to Midsummer Common and the River Cam, in this sought after and centrally located scheme adjacent to Christ's Pieces"
"Auction Sale - 18/04/2023 An attracive two bedroom mid terrace house plus an additional loft room, in need of some modernisation, benefitting from a large south easterly facing garden, well located for transport links and amenities. Vacant."
"This modern, well presented, two-bedroom ground floor apartment, within the popular development of Orchard Park, on the outskirts of the city of Cambridge, places well as either a first-time buy or investment opportunity, within a stones throw of local amenities and transport links from the North..."
"A recently redecorated two bedroom first floor apartment in an immaculate condition, benefiting from tranquil views overlooking the green and close proximity to Cambridge North Station, the Guided Busway and both Science and Business Parks, sold with the advantage of no onward chain"
"A well-presented first floor flat located in a cul de sac position on the east side of Cambridge, within easy access of the city centre and the A14/M11. The property is offered for sale with the benefit of no onward chain."
"A superb investment or first-time purchasing opportunity to the North-East of the Cambridge City centre, in Meadowlands Road, CB5. This two-bedroom cluster house benefits from a wealth of natural light, as well as being sold with two incentives, one being the ownership of the freehold to this pro..."
"Final 2 bed apartments remaining in our current release. Register your interest to book an appointment today! £255,000 for a 75% share. Full market value £340,000. "
A first floor one double bedroom apartment in a sought after development within easy reach of the city centre and local amenities. The property offers fine views across the central communal gardens with underground car park beneath. Sold with the advantage of no upward and available to view now.
"A well presented, one-bedroom, ground floor apartment situated in a popular area of Cambridge, only a short walk to the River Cam. The property comes with a spacious open plan living space, one double bedroom and the bathroom, which is a three-piece suite."
** CALL BIDWELLS TO BOOK IN A VIEWING FOR THIS SUPERB APARTMENT **
A particularly spacious ground floor one bedroom apartment available as a 75% or 100% share with the added advantage of a private enclosed garden and parking space.
"A very spacious first floor two bedroom apartment on Molewood Close, just off Histon Road on the north of the city giving quick and easy to central Cambridge, the Science Park, Cambridge North railway station and the A14, benefitting from gas central heating and double glazed windows. No onward c..."
"A purpose built 1 bedroom ground floor apartment in a near central location close to the city centre and various other leisure and retail facilities. Shared garden, allocated parking space and secure cycle storage. Sold with no upward chain."
"ONLINE VIEWING AVAILABLE! A stylish second floor, studio apartment, in a popular, sought-after development, close to the city centre and Addenbrooke's Hospital/Biomedical Campus. INVESTORS ONLY"
"A first floor, smartly presented 1 bedroom flat of 49 sqm / 530 sqft located just off Histon Road allowing easy access to the city centre, the Cambridge Science Park and Cambridge North station."
"A beautifully presented, first floor flat, with enviable views over the central communal gardens. Offered with no upward chain, the property enjoys a convenient location close to the city centre and has under croft parking and a bike store."
"**Best and Final Offers to be submitted in writing by 1200hrs on Tuesday 28th March 2023** An attractive investment or first-time purchase within the Kings Hedges ward, requiring sympathetic redecoration throughout and offered for sale with no upward chain. In brief, the accommod..."
A spacious one bedroom ground floor maisonette in a popular city location
** CALL TO ARRANGE A VIEWING TODAY ** Superb opportunity to purchase a 1 bedroom apartment inclusive of parking and finished to high standard.
"A deceptively spacious two bedroom retirement apartment, situated within the sought after Brooklyn Court development on Cherry Hinton Road, close to amenities and transport links. Further benefits include 24 hour emergency care, communal areas and is offered with no forward chain."
"The property is a STUDENTS ONLY let. New tenancy agreed from April 2023 paying £1,300 per calendar month plus bills, on an Assured Shorthold Tenancy contract for 12 months. We present a modern one bed flat from an award-winning 2014 residential development. It is a rare investment opportunity in..."
"*Best and Final Offers by 13:00, Thursday 30th March* A two bedroom, ground-floor apartment situated within a quiet cul-de-sac that provides easy access to the A14/M11 and backs onto field views. The property inside is spacious and bright with the main hub of the home being the open plan livin..."
A ground floor 2 Bedroom apartment for occupiers over the age of 55 situated in a secluded position at the rear of an attractive scheme close to local facilities.
"A superb investment or first-time purchasing opportunity to the North-East of the Cambridge City centre, in Meadowlands Road, CB5. This one-bedroom cluster house benefits from a wealth of natural light and lies within a prominent location close to key road-links on the M11 and A14. Up..."
"A TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT ACCESS TO OUTSIDE FROM LIVING ROOM. Alder Court is conveniently situated across the road from Post Office and hairdressers, bus stop is outside which provides easy bus access to shops and doctors. Alder Court was constructed by McCarthy &..."
A well-presented and very well-proportioned two bedroom ground floor retirement property situated in this popular development in Cambridge.
"Located in the highly sought after Aura Development on the south side of the City Centre, this Three Bedroom Family House is available on a 40% Shared Ownership basis."
This is your chance to purchase this luxury studio apartment boasting contemporary styling and interior design. This property is set within a superb development located close to the railway station (Station Road) and enjoying proximity to the city centre. It comprises a separate shower room and a...
"A well-presented and well-maintained one bedroom first floor situated just off Wadloes Road, offering easy access to a great range of local amenities, the city centre and A14 road network"
"An ideally located one bedroom ground floor apartment situated a short walk to Cambridge North Station, the Guided Busway and both Science and Business Parks, sold with the benefit of no onward chain"
"A superb opportunity to purchase this spacious one bedroom apartment located close to Cambridge Science Park with fantastic access links into Cambridge, A14 and M11. Ideal as an investment property, for sale with no onward chain."
"A very well proportioned, three double bedroom house with a first floor sitting room, sizable kitchen / dining room and a south-east facing garden. This property is available as a 35% share."
"A well presented and improved, two bedroom first floor apartment located within this popular development for over 60s off Cherry Hinton Road, with communal grounds and parking area. The block has recently had all the windows changed to Upvc double glazed units."
"An opportunity to acquire a well presented one double bedroom ground floor apartment forming part of the Haig Court retirement development for ages over 60, situated within the ever popular village of Chesterton"
"Three bedroom link-detached home on 35% Shared Ownership with opportunity to staircase to 100%, located south of Cambridge within the highly regarded Trumpington Meadows development with excellent transport links M11, A10 and a short walk to Addenbrookes Hospital"
"Introducing a stylish studio apartment located on the second floor of the stunning Mallory House development, purpose-built for students with exceptional attention to detail throughout. This contemporary property is just a stone's throw away from both the city centre and ARU, making it an unbeata..."
"Two bedroom two storey apartment with a balcony and allocated parking, sold on a 50% Shared Ownership scheme and with no onward chain. Conveniently located close to various local amenities, the river and the city centre"
"Available Now: 2-bedroom first floor maisonette in Chesterton, Cambridge"
"A well presented first floor apartment in a convenient North City location close to the A14, Science Park and Cambridge North Railway Station."
"RM0398 We are delighted to introduce on the market this beautiful studio flat located in Cambridge. If you are looking for a very well-presented studio flat as a great investment opportunity or as your first home, then this is the property for you.
"
An excellent opportunity to purchase this recently refurbished and well-proportioned ground floor apartment in this retirement development offering a wealth of communal opportunities for residents while be ideally located to access a wealth of local amenities and the city centre.
"Final 2 bed apartments remaining in our current release. Register your interest to book an appointment today! £170,000 for a 50% share. Full market value £340,000. "
"An ideal opportunity for first time buyers or investors alike, located north of Cambridge and benefits from local amenities and convenient access to the North Station, Business Parks and A14 road network"
"An attractive investment or first-time purchase within the Kings Hedges ward, requiring sympathetic redecoration throughout and offered for sale with no upward chain. This price of £168,000 is being offered as a 70% Shared ownership, with the remaining 30% currently owned by the local autho..."
"Available Now! 1 bedroom first floor apartment in Trumpington, Cambridge, available to purchase through the Shared Ownership Scheme"
"Rarely available Ground floor studio apartment located within a short distance from Cambridge North train station and Science and Business Parks. Ideal as an investment purchase or for first time buyer. The property comprises of a lounge/bedroom, separate kitchen and good size bathro..."
A first floor one bedroom retirement apartment situated at the front of the block in a convenient and central Romsey Town location close to shops and amenities and sold with the advantage of no upward chain.
"A bright, well-proportioned and very well-presented two bedroom first floor over flat situated in this popular over 60's development just-off Cherry Hinton Road offering excellent access to local amenities including GP's, Dental Surgery and Co-op, plus transport links into the city centre,"
"Available Now! 2 bedroom apartment in Cambridge, available to purchase through the Shared Ownership Scheme"
A second floor one bedroom apartment located in CB4. The property is an ideal first time purchase for a buyer starting out on the property ladder
"Just launched - a brand new collection of 3 bedroom Shared Ownership houses in Cambridge. Register your interest to find out more! £159,750 for a 30% share. Full market value £532,500. "
"A beautifully presented apartment set in a luxury retirement complex for which the vendors will pay the first 2 years of the service charge. Fantastic facilities include an indoor swimming pool, spa, cinema, and restaurant located to the western edge of the city."
"Available now! 2 bedroom apartment in Trumpington, Cambridge, available to purchase through the Shared Ownership scheme."
A very well presented one bedroom ground floor apartment in this well regarded and near-central retirement development for the over 60's.
A one bedroom top floor apartment with L shape living room and refitted kitchen and shower room in an attractive and well appointed residential scheme for the over 60s just over 1 mile north of the City Centre.
"A ground floor retirement apartment in this well regarded complex available to those over the age of 60. The property is well presented throughout with accommodation comprising entrance hallway, sitting/dining room, fitted kitchen, one double bedroom and recently re-fitted bathroom suite. The dev..."
A one bedroom second floor apartment in an attractive and well appointed residential scheme for the over 60s just over 1 mile north of the City Centre.
"A second floor spacious and well maintained retirement apartment forming part of a highly regarded scheme available to those over the age of 60. The property offers well planned accommodation comprising one generous bedroom, sitting/dining room, fitted kitchen and shower room. Benefiting from wel..."
A bright and well presented one bedroom apartment in this popular and well located residential scheme for the over 60's.
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT PROPERTY ON THE FIRST FLOOR. THE PROPERTY HAS A SOUTH/WEST ASPECT WITH NO CHAIN Alder Court is conveniently situated across the road from Post Office and hairdressers, bus stop is outside which provides easy bus access to shops and doctors. Alder Court was construct..."
"A smart, first-floor apartment offering spacious, modern, high specification accommodation throughout, with a good sized balcony overlooking the superb communal grounds. The property is conveniently situated within 15 mins walk of Cambridge city centre and is within easy reach of Jesus Green."
"Available Now! 1 bedroom apartment in Cambridge, available to purchase through the Shared Ownership Scheme"
***** SHARED OWNERSHIP AVAILABLE FROM 40% SHARE***** A well presented two Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment with allocated parking situated in the desirable location of Girton. 
"We are pleased to offer a 30% share on this well-presented 2 Bedroom ground floor apartment on a popular side of the city within walking distance to Addenbrookes Hospital and a 10 minute drive to the train station. Comprising of 2 Double Bedrooms, with an Ensuite, fully fitted kitchen and view..."
"A welcoming and well proportioned one bedroom first floor retirement property which forms part of the Havenfield development, offered for sale with the advantage of no onward chain"
"A simply stunning much improved, redecorated and refitted ground floor one bedroom retirement flat presented to exceptional standards just off Arbury Road, available with the distinct advantage of no upward sales chain."
"Beautifully refurbished and well-appointed over 60s apartment, available now, in sought after development close to local amenities and Cambridge city centre."
50% Shared Ownership. A bright and well maintained one bedroom flat with excellent transport links.
"A very well-presented one bedroom ground flat apartment, in this highly desirable location just off Addenbrookes Road, Trumpington. The property is offered for sale on a 35% shared ownership basis and offers an excellent opportunity to get a first step on the property ladder."
A spacious over 60s apartment close to various amenities and located in the popular Havenfield development
"A very well-presented two bedroom apartment with its own private balcony, in this highly desirable location just off Addenbrookes Road, Trumpington. The property is offered for sale on a 30% shared ownership basis and offers an excellent opportunity to get a first step on the property ladder."
A completely re-furbished 1 bedroom first floor corner apartment situated in the annexe of a popular retirement scheme for the over 60's. Conveniently located to the North side of the city with excellent facilities on site and plentiful amenities nearby.
"A larger than average one bedroom first floor corner apartment in a popular retirement scheme, conveniently located to the North side of the city with plentiful amenities nearby."
A well presented one bedroom 2nd floor retirement apartment situated within this purpose built complex with excellent local facilities and easy access into the city.
A purpose built first floor retirement flat in this convenient position with views over the communal gardens located near regular public transport links to the city centre and Addenbrookes - available for viewing with the distinct advantage of no upward chain. Note. This property must be sold. 
"A first floor flat in a highly regarded over 55's development with views over the communal gardens. Conveniently located to the south of the city, near regular public transport to the city centre and Addenbrookes. The property offers well-proportioned accommodation and is offered with no upward c..."
"Placed well within an ideal location and adjacent to the popular Hills Road and its’ many amenities, is this one double-bedroom apartment, within the development of Homerton House, complete with modern fittings throughout. The property is offered for sale as a 30% share, as part of a shared..."
"Final 2 bed apartments remaining in our current release. Register your interest to book an appointment today! £85,000 for a 25% share. Full market value £340,000."
